North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Part 2. The Oil and Gas Conservation Act.

§ 113-381.
Title.

This law shall be designated and known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Act.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of Session Laws 1945, c. 702, from which this Part derives, see 23 N.C.L. Rev. 332 (1945).

§ 113-382.
Declaration of policy.

In recognition of imminent evils that can occur in the production and use and waste of natural oil and/or gas in the absence of equal or correlative rights of owners of crude oil or natural gas in a common source of supply to produce and use the same, and in the absence of adequate measures for the protection of the environment, this law is enacted for the protection of public interests against such evils by prohibiting waste and compelling ratable production and authorizing regulations for the protection of the environment.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 2; 1971, c. 813, ss. 3, 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Evolution of Modern North Carolina Environmental and Conservation Policy Legislation,” see 29 Campbell L. Rev. 535 (2007).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Roy G. Sowers, Jr., Director, Department of Conservation and Development, 40 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 67 (1970).

§§ 113-383 through 113-386.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 86.

§§ 113-387,
113-388.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-4, s. 17(c), effective July 1, 2015, and applicable to energy minerals severed on or after that date.

History.

113-387; 1945, c. 702, s. 7; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 113-388; 1945, c. 702, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 110.

§ 113-389.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the words defined in this section shall have the following meaning when found in this law:

“Base fluid” shall mean the continuous phase fluid type, such as water, used in a hydraulic fracturing treatment.

(1a)

“Commission” shall mean the North Carolina Oil and Gas Commission.

(1b)

“Department” shall mean the Department of Environmental Quality.

(1c)

“Division” shall mean the Division of Energy, Mineral, and Land Resources of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Field” shall mean the general area which is underlaid or appears to be underlaid by at least one pool; and “field” shall include the underground reservoir or reservoirs containing crude petroleum oil or natural gas, or both. The words “field” and “pool” mean the same thing when only one underground reservoir is involved; “field,” unlike “pool,” may relate to two or more pools.

“Gas” shall mean all natural gas, including casing-head gas, and all other hydrocarbons not defined as oil in subdivision (7).

(3a)

“Hydraulic fracturing additive” shall mean any chemical substance or combination of substances, including any chemical or proppants, which is intentionally added to a base fluid for purposes of preparing a hydraulic fracturing fluid or treatment of a well.

(3b)

“Hydraulic fracturing fluid” shall mean the fluid, including the applicable base fluid and all hydraulic fracturing additives, used to perform a hydraulic fracturing treatment.

(3c)

“Hydraulic fracturing treatment” shall mean all stages of the treatment of a well by the application of hydraulic fracturing fluid under pressure that is expressly designed to initiate or propagate fractures in a target geologic formation to enhance production of oil and gas.

“Illegal gas” shall mean gas which has been produced within the State of North Carolina from any well during any time that well has produced in excess of the amount allowed by any rule, regulation or order of the Department, as distinguished from gas produced within the State of North Carolina from a well not producing in excess of the amount so allowed, which is “legal gas.”

“Illegal oil” shall mean oil which has been produced within the State of North Carolina from any well during any time that that well has produced in excess of the amount allowed by rule, regulation or order of the Department, as distinguished from oil produced within the State of North Carolina from a well not producing in excess of the amount so allowed, which is “legal oil.”

“Illegal product” shall mean any product of oil or gas, any part of which was processed or derived, in whole or in part, from illegal oil or illegal gas or from any product thereof, as distinguished from “legal product,” which is a product processed or derived to no extent from illegal oil or illegal gas.

(6a)

“Lessee” shall mean the person entitled under an oil and gas lease to drill and operate wells.

(6b)

“Lessor” shall mean the owner of subsurface oil or gas resources who has executed a lease and who is entitled to the payment of a royalty on production.

“Oil” shall mean crude petroleum oil, and other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, which are produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods, and which are not the result of condensation of gas after it leaves the reservoir.

(7a)

“Oil and gas developer or operator” or “developer or operator” shall mean a person who acquires a lease for the purpose of conducting exploration for or extracting oil or gas.

(7b)

“Oil and gas operations” or “activities” shall mean the exploration for or drilling of an oil and gas well that requires entry upon surface estate and the production operations directly related to the exploration or drilling.

“Owner” shall mean the person who has the right to drill into and to produce from any pool, and to appropriate the production either for himself or for himself and others.

“Person” shall mean any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary or representative of any kind.

“Pool” shall mean an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas or both. Each zone of a general structure which is completely separated from the other zone in the structure is covered by the term “pool” as used herein.

“Producer” shall mean the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas, or both.

“Product” means any commodity made from oil or gas and shall include refined crude oil, crude tops, topped crude, processed crude petroleum, residue from crude petroleum, cracking stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel oil, treated crude oil, residuum, gas oil, casing-head gasoline, natural gas gasoline, naphtha, distillate, gasoline, kerosene, benzine, wash oil, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil, blends or mixtures of oil with one or more liquid products or by-products derived from oil or gas, and blends or mixtures of two or more liquid products or by-products derived from oil or gas, whether hereinabove enumerated or not.

(12a)

“Proppant” shall mean sand or any natural or man-made material that is used in a hydraulic fracturing treatment to prop open the artificially created or enhanced fractures once the treatment is completed.

(12b)

“Surface owner” means the person who holds record title to or has a purchaser’s interest in the surface of real property.

“Tender” shall mean a permit or certificate of clearance for the transportation of oil, gas or products, approved and issued or registered under the authority of the Department.

“Waste” in addition to its ordinary meaning, shall mean “physical waste” as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry. It shall include:

The inefficient, excessive or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner which results, or tends to result, in reducing inefficiently the quantity of oil or gas ultimately to be recovered from any pool in this State.

The inefficient storing of oil, and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner causing, or tending to cause, unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas.

Abuse of the correlative rights and opportunities of each owner of oil and gas in a common reservoir due to nonuniform, disproportionate, and unratable withdrawals causing undue drainage between tracts of land.

Producing oil or gas in such manner as to cause unnecessary water channelling or coning.

The operation of any oil well or wells with an inefficient gas-oil ratio.

The drowning with water of any stratum or part thereof capable of producing oil or gas.

Underground waste however caused and whether or not defined.

The creation of unnecessary fire hazards.

The escape into the open air, from a well producing both oil and gas, of gas in excess of the amount which is necessary in the efficient drilling or operation of the well.

Permitting gas produced from a gas well to escape into the air.

“Water supply” shall mean any groundwater or surface water intended or used for human consumption; household purposes; or farm, livestock, or garden purposes.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 9; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(59); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-276, s. 3(a); 2012-143, s. 2(b); 2014-4, s. 4(c); 2015-241 s. 14.30(u).

§ 113-390.
Waste prohibited.

Waste of oil or gas as defined in this law is hereby prohibited.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 10.

§ 113-391.
Jurisdiction and authority; rules and orders.

The Oil and Gas Commission, created by G.S. 143B-293.1, in conjunction with rule-making authority specifically reserved to the Environmental Management Commission under subsection (a3) of this section, shall establish a modern regulatory program for the management of oil and gas exploration and development in the State and the use of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments for that purpose. The program shall be designed to protect public health and safety; protect public and private property; protect and conserve the State’s air, water, and other natural resources; promote economic development and expand employment opportunities; and provide for the productive and efficient development of the State’s oil and gas resources. To establish the program, the Commission shall adopt rules for all of the following purposes:

Regulation of pre-drilling exploration activities, including seismic and other geophysical and stratigraphic surveys and testing.

Regulation of drilling, operation, casing, plugging, completion, and abandonment of wells.

Prevention of pollution of water supplies by oil, gas, or other fluids used in oil and gas exploration and development.

Protection of the quality of the water, air, soil, or any other environmental resource against injury or damage or impairment.

Regulation of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments for the purpose of oil and gas exploration. Such rules shall, at a minimum, include standards or requirements related to the following:

Information and data to be submitted in association with applications for permits to conduct oil and gas exploration and development activities using horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments, which may include submission of hydrogeological investigations and identification of mechanisms to prevent and diagnose sources of groundwater contamination in the area of drilling sites. In formulating these requirements, the Commission shall consider (i) how North Carolina’s geology differs from other states where oil and gas exploration and development activities using horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments are common and (ii) the routes of possible groundwater contamination resulting from these activities and the potential role of vertical geological structures such as dikes and faults as conduits for groundwater contamination.

Collection of baseline data, including groundwater, surface water, and air quality in areas where oil and gas exploration and development activities are proposed. With regard to rules applicable to baseline data for groundwater and surface water, the Commission shall adopt rules that, at a minimum, establish standards to satisfy the pre-drilling testing requirement established under G.S. 113-421(a), including contaminants for which an operator or developer must test and necessary qualifications for persons conducting such tests.

Appropriate construction standards for oil and gas wells, which shall address the additional pressures of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments. These rules, at a minimum, shall include standards for casing and cementing sufficient to handle highly pressurized injection of hydraulic fracturing fluids into a well for purposes of fracturing bedrock and extraction of gas, and construction standards for other gas production infrastructure, such as storage pits and tanks.

Appropriate siting standards for wells and other gas production infrastructure, such as storage pits and tanks, including appropriate setback requirements and identification of areas, such as floodplains, where oil and gas exploration and production activities should be prohibited. Siting standards adopted shall be consistent with any applicable water quality standards adopted by the Environmental Management Commission or by local governments pursuant to water quality statutes, including standards for development in water supply watersheds.

Limits on water use, including, but not limited to, a requirement that oil and gas operators prepare and have a water and wastewater management plan approved by the Department, which, among other things, limits water withdrawals during times of drought and periods of low flows. Rules adopted shall be (i) developed in light of water supply in the areas of proposed activity, competing water uses in those areas, and expected environmental impacts from such water withdrawals and (ii) consistent with statutes, and rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to those statutes, which govern water quality and management of water resources, including, but not limited to, statutes and rules applicable to water withdrawal registration, interbasin transfer requirements, and water quality standards related to wastewater discharges.

Management of wastes produced in connection with oil and gas exploration and development and use of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments for that purpose. Such rules shall address storage, transportation, and disposal of wastes that may contain radioactive materials or wastes that may be toxic or have other hazardous wastes’ characteristics that are not otherwise regulated as a hazardous waste by the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA), such as top-hole water, brines, drilling fluids, additives, drilling muds, stimulation fluids, well servicing fluids, oil, production fluids, and drill cuttings from the drilling, alteration, production, plugging, or other activity associated with oil and gas wells. Wastes generated in connection with oil and gas exploration and development and use of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments for that purpose that constitute hazardous waste under RCRA shall be subject to rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission to implement RCRA requirements in the State.

Prohibitions on use of certain chemicals and constituents in hydraulic fracturing fluids, particularly diesel fuel.

Disclosure of chemicals and constituents used in oil and gas exploration, drilling, and production, including hydraulic fracturing fluids, to State regulatory agencies and to local government emergency response officials, and, with the exception of those items constituting trade secrets, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3), and that are designated as confidential or as a trade secret under

G.S. 132-1.2

, requirements for disclosure of those chemicals and constituents to the public.

Installation of appropriate safety devices and development of protocols for response to well blowouts, chemical spills, and other emergencies, including requirements for approved emergency response plans and certified personnel to implement these plans as needed.

Measures to mitigate impacts on infrastructure, including damage to roads by truck traffic and heavy equipment, in areas where oil and gas exploration and development activities that use horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing technologies are proposed to occur.

Notice, record keeping, and reporting.

Proper well closure, site reclamation, post-closure monitoring, and financial assurance. Rules for financial assurance shall require that an oil or gas developer or operator establish financial assurance that will ensure that sufficient funds are available for well closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, any corrective action that the Department may require, and to satisfy any potential liability for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences, and subsequent costs incurred by the Department in response to an incident involving a drilling operation, even if the developer or operator becomes insolvent or ceases to reside, be incorporated, do business, or maintain assets in the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-4, s. 9, effective June 4, 2014.

To require the making of reports showing the location of oil and gas wells and the filing of logs and drilling records.

To prevent “blowouts,” “caving,” and “seepage,” as such terms are generally understood in the oil and gas industry.

To identify the ownership of all oil or gas wells, producing leases, refineries, tanks, plants, structures, and all storage and transportation equipment and facilities.

To regulate the “shooting,” perforating, and chemical treatment of wells.

To regulate secondary recovery methods, including the introduction of gas, air, water, or other substances into producing formations.

To regulate the spacing of wells and to establish drilling units.

To regulate and, if necessary in its judgment for the protection of unique environmental values, to prohibit the location of wells in the interest of protecting the quality of the water, air, soil, or any other environmental resource against injury, damage, or impairment.

(13a)

Criteria to set the amount of a bond required pursuant to G.S. 113-421(a3), including, at a minimum, the number of wells proposed at a site, the pre-drilling condition of the property, the amount of acreage that would be impacted by the proposed oil and gas activities, and other factors designed to enable establishment of bonds on a site-by-site basis.

Any other matter the Commission deems necessary for implementation of a modern regulatory program for the management of oil and gas exploration and development in the State and the use of horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing for that purpose.

(a1)

The regulatory program required to be established and the rules required to be adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not include a program or rules for the regulation of oil and gas exploration and development in the waters of the Atlantic Ocean and the coastal sounds as defined in

G.S. 113A-103

.

(a2)

In addition to the matters for which the Commission is required to adopt rules pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Commission may adopt rules as it deems necessary for any of the following purposes:

(1)

To require the operation of wells with efficient gas-oil ratios and to fix such ratios.

(2)

To limit and prorate the production of oil or gas, or both, from any pool or field for the prevention of waste as defined in this Article and rules adopted thereunder.

(3)

To require, either generally or in or from particular areas, certificates of clearance or tenders in connection with the transportation of oil or gas.

(4)

To prevent, so far as is practicable, reasonably avoidable drainage from each developed unit which is not equalized by counter-drainage.

(a3)

The Environmental Management Commission shall adopt rules, after consideration of recommendations from the Oil and Gas Commission, for all of the following purposes:

(1)

Stormwater control for sites on which oil and gas exploration and development activities are conducted.

(2)

Regulation of toxic air emissions from drilling operations, if it determines that the State’s current air toxics program and any federal regulations governing toxic air emissions from drilling operations to be adopted by the State by reference are inadequate to protect public health, safety, welfare, and the environment. In formulating appropriate standards, the Department shall assess emissions from oil and gas exploration and development activities that use horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing technologies, including emissions from associated truck traffic, in order to (i) determine the adequacy of the State’s current air toxics program to protect landowners who lease their property to drilling operations and (ii) determine the impact on ozone levels in the area in order to determine measures needed to maintain compliance with federal ozone standards.

(a4)

The Department shall administer and enforce the provisions of this Article, and rules adopted thereunder, and all other laws relating to the conservation of oil and gas, except for jurisdiction and authority reserved to the Department of Labor and the
Oil and Gas Commission, as otherwise provided. The Commission and the Department may issue orders as may be necessary from time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Article and rules adopted thereunder.

(a5)

Entry of rules in the North Carolina Administrative Code that address the areas identified by subsections (a) and (a3) of this section by July 1, 2015, create a rebuttable presumption that the rules are sufficient to meet the requirements for development of a modern regulatory program pursuant to this section.

(a6)

The Commission shall have the authority to develop rules addressing requirements for: permit applications; permit modifications; permit conditions; denial of applications for permits; permit transfers from one person to another; and permit durations, suspensions, revocations, and release.

The Commission and the Department, as appropriate, shall have the authority and it shall be their duty to make such inquiries as may be proper to implement the provisions of this Article. In the exercise of such power the Commission and the Department, as appropriate, shall have the authority to collect data; to make investigations and inspections; to examine properties, leases, papers, books and records; to examine, check, test and gauge oil and gas wells, tanks, refineries, and means of transportation; to hold hearings; and to provide for the keeping of records and the making of reports; and to take such action as may be reasonably necessary to enforce this law.

(b1)

In the exercise of their respective authority over oil and gas exploration and development activities, the Commission and the Department, as applicable, shall have access to all data, records, and information related to such activities, including, but not limited to, seismic surveys, stratigraphic testing, geologic cores, proposed well bore trajectories, hydraulic fracturing fluid chemicals and constituents, drilling mud chemistry, and geophysical borehole logs. With the exception of information designated as a trade secret, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3), and that is designated as confidential or as a trade secret under

G.S. 132-1.2

, the Department shall make any information it receives available to the public. The State Geologist, or the State Geologist’s designee, shall serve as the custodian of all data, information, and records received by the Department pursuant to this subsection, including information designated as a trade secret, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3), and that is designated as confidential or as a trade secret under

G.S. 132-1.2

, and shall ensure that all of the information, including information designated as a trade secret, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3), and that is designated as confidential or as a trade secret under G.S. 132-1.2, is maintained securely as provided in

G.S. 132-7

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-143, s. 2(c), effective August 1, 2012.

The Department of Labor shall develop, adopt, and enforce rules establishing health and safety standards for workers engaged in oil and gas operations in the State, including operations in which hydraulic fracturing treatments are used for that purpose.

The Department shall submit an annual report on its activities conducted pursuant to this Article and rules adopted under it to the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly on or before October 1 of each year.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 11; 1971, c. 813, ss. 5, 6; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 111; 1989, c. 727, s. 120; 2012-143, s. 2(c); 2013-365, s. 5(b); 2014-4, ss. 4(c), 7(a), 8(b), 9; 2014-122, s. 11(j); 2015-1, s. 6(a); 2017-57, s. 14.1(qq).

§ 113-391.1.
Trade secret and confidential information determination; protection; retention; disclosure to emergency personnel.

Legislative Findings. — The General Assembly finds that while confidential information must be maintained as such with the utmost care, for the protection of public health, safety, and the environment, the information should be immediately accessible to first responders and medical personnel in the event that the information is deemed necessary to address an emergency.

Determination and Treatment of Confidential Information. — Information obtained by the Commission and the Department pursuant to this Article, and rules adopted thereunder, shall be available to the public except that, upon a showing satisfactory to the Commission by any person that information to which the Commission and Department has access, if made public, would divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as confidential information pursuant to

G.S. 132-1.2

, the Commission shall consider the information confidential. In accordance with subsection (b1) of

G.S. 113-391

, the State Geologist shall serve as the custodian of the confidential information and shall ensure that it is maintained securely as provided in

G.S. 132-7

. The State Geologist, or the Geologist’s designee, shall:

Review confidential information that concerns hydraulic fracturing fluid, as that term is defined in

G.S. 113-389

, to ensure compliance with all State and federal laws, rules, and regulations concerning prohibited chemicals or constituents, or exceedances of standards for chemicals or constituents. The State Geologist, or the Geologist’s designee, shall issue a written certification within five days of completion of the review that the hydraulic fracturing fluids, including chemicals and constituents contained therein, comply with all State and federal laws, rules, and regulations; (ii) transmit the certification to the Mining and Energy Commission and the Director of the Division of Energy, Mining, and Land Resources; and (iii) transmit a copy of the certification electronically to the permittee. Horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing treatments shall not commence until this written certification has been issued and transmitted as required by this subsection.

Review, in consultation with the State Health Director, confidential information that concerns hydraulic fracturing fluid, as that term is defined in

G.S. 113-389

, to advise local health departments of additional parameters that should be included in testing for private drinking water wells in their jurisdictions in compliance with the requirements of

G.S. 87-97

and the Private Well Water Education Act enacted by S.L. 2013-122.

Exceptions to Disclosure Prohibitions. — Confidential information obtained by the Commission and the Department pursuant to this Article, and rules adopted thereunder, may be disclosed to any officer, employee, or authorized representative of any federal or State agency if disclosure is necessary to carry out a proper function of the Department or other agency or when relevant in any proceeding under this Article. Confidential information shall be disclosed to the following:

The Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Public Safety. The Division shall maintain this information as confidential except if disclosure is necessary to carry out a proper function of the Division, including for the purposes of emergency planning and emergency response. For purposes of this section, the term “emergency” is defined as provided in

G.S. 166A-19.3

.

A treating health care provider who determines that a medical emergency exists and that the information is necessary for emergency or first aid treatment. Regardless of the existence of a written statement of need or a confidentiality agreement, the Department shall immediately disclose the confidential information to the treating health care provider upon request. If confidential information is disclosed pursuant to this subdivision, the Department shall notify the owner of the confidential information as soon as practicable, but no later than 24 hours after disclosure. The owner of the confidential information may require execution of a written statement of need and a confidentiality agreement from the treating health care provider as soon as circumstances permit. The confidentiality agreement (i) may restrict the use of the information to the health purposes indicated in a written statement of need; (ii) may provide for appropriate legal remedies in the event of a breach of the agreement, including stipulation of a reasonable pre-estimate of likely damages; and (iii) may not include requirements for the posting of a penalty bond. The parties are not precluded from pursuing noncontractual remedies to the extent permitted by law.

A Fire Chief, as that term is defined in

G.S. 95-174

, who determines that an emergency exists and that the information is necessary to address the emergency. Regardless of the existence of a written statement of need or a confidentiality agreement, the Department shall immediately disclose the confidential information to the Fire Chief upon request. If confidential information is disclosed pursuant to this subdivision, the Department shall notify the owner of the confidential information as soon as practicable, but no later than 24 hours after disclosure. The owner of the confidential information may require execution of a written statement of need and a confidentiality agreement from the Fire Chief as soon as circumstances permit. The confidentiality agreement (i) may restrict the use of the information to the emergency purposes indicated in a written statement of need; (ii) may provide for appropriate legal remedies in the event of a breach of the agreement, including stipulation of a reasonable pre-estimate of likely damages; and (iii) may not include requirements for the posting of a penalty bond. The parties are not precluded from pursuing noncontractual remedies to the extent permitted by law.

Penalties for Unlawful Disclosure. — Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section or as otherwise provided by law, any person who has access to confidential information pursuant to this section and who knowingly and willfully discloses it to any person not authorized to receive it shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and shall be subject to civil action for damages and injunction by the owner of the confidential information, including, without limitation, actions under Article 24 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes.

Appeal From Commission Decisions Concerning Confidentiality. — Within 10 days of any decision made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the Commission shall provide notice to any person who submits information asserted to be confidential (i) that the information is not entitled to confidential treatment and (ii) of any decision to release such information to any person who has requested the information. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 132-9

, or procedures for appeal provided under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, any person who requests information and any person who submits information who is dissatisfied with a decision of the Commission to withhold or release information made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall have 30 days after receipt of notification from the Commission to appeal by filing an action in superior court and in accordance with the procedures for a mandatory complex business case set forth in

G.S. 7A-45.4

. Notwithstanding any other provision of

G.S. 7A-45.4

, the appeal shall be heard de novo by a judge designated as a Business Court Judge under

G.S. 7A-45.3

. The information may not be released by the Commission until the earlier of (i) the 30-day period for filing of an appeal has expired without filing of an appeal or (ii) a final judicial determination has been made in an action brought to appeal a decision of the Commission. In addition, the following shall apply to actions brought pursuant to this section:

Such actions shall be set down for immediate hearing.

The burden shall be on the owner of the information to show that the information is entitled to protection as confidential information pursuant to

G.S. 132-1.2

.

The court shall allow a party seeking disclosure of information who substantially prevails to recover its reasonable attorneys’ fees if attributed to the information. The court may not assess attorneys’ fees against the Commission or the Department, however, but shall impose such fees on the owner of the information asserting confidentiality.

If the court determines that an action brought pursuant to this section was filed in bad faith or was frivolous, the court shall assess reasonable attorneys’ fees against the person or persons instituting the action and award to the prevailing party or parties.

History.

2014-4, s. 8(a); 2014-115, s. 67.

§ 113-392.
Protecting pool owners; drilling units in pools; location of wells; shares in pools.

Whether or not the total production from a pool be limited or prorated, no rule or order of the Commission shall be such in terms or effect:

That it shall be necessary at any time for the producer from, or the owner of, a tract of land in the pool, in order that he may obtain such tract’s just and equitable share of the production of such pool, as such share is set forth in this section, to drill and operate any well or wells on such tract in addition to such well or wells as can produce without waste such share, or

As to occasion net drainage from a tract unless there be drilled and operated upon such tract a well or wells in addition to such well or wells thereon as can produce without waste such tract’s just and equitable share, as set forth in this section, of the production of such pool.

For the prevention of waste and to avoid the augmenting and accumulation of risks arising from the drilling of an excessive number of wells, the Commission shall, after a hearing, establish a drilling unit or units for each pool. The Commission may establish drainage units of uniform size for the entire pool or may, if the facts so justify, divide into zones any pool, establish a drainage unit for each zone, which unit may differ in size from that established in any other zone; and the Commission may from time to time, if the facts so justify, change the size of the unit established for the entire pool or for any zone or zones, or part thereof, establishing new zones and units if the facts justify their establishment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-4, s. 10, effective June 4, 2014.

Subject to the reasonable requirements for prevention of waste, a producer’s just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool (also sometimes referred to as a tract’s just and equitable share) is that part of the authorized production for the pool (whether it be the total which could be produced without any restriction on the amount of production, or whether it be an amount less than that which the pool could produce if no restriction on the amount were imposed) which is substantially in the proportion that the quantity of recoverable oil and gas in the developed area of his tract in the pool bears to the recoverable oil and gas in the total developed area of the pool, insofar as these amounts can be ascertained practically; and to that end, the rules, permits and orders of the Commission shall be such as will prevent or minimize reasonably avoidable net drainage from each developed unit (that is, drainage which is not equalized by counter-drainage), and will give to each producer the opportunity to use his just and equitable share of the reservoir energy.

History.

1945, c. 702, s. 12; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1987, c. 827, s. 112; 2012-143, s. 2(d); 2014-4, s. 10.